src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaapp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kååʹpp a-stem kuoppa: # Noun - full paradigm
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Nom: kååʹpp
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Gen: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Acc: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Ill: kåppa
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Loc: kååʹvest
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Com: kooʹvin
     kååʹpp+N+Ess: kååʹppen
     kååʹpp+N+Par: kååʹpped
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Abe: [kååʹvtaa, kååʹvtää]
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Nom: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Gen: kooʹvi
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Acc: kooʹvid
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Ill: kooʹvid
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Loc: kooʹvin
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Com: kooʹvivuiʹm
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Abe: [kooʹvitaa, kooʹvitää]
